Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB594.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4 of the act of October 27, 1955 (P.L.744, No.222), known as the Pennsylvania Human Relations Act, is amended by adding clauses to read:Section 4. Definitions.--As used in this act unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:* * *(bb) The term "automated employment decision tool" means any system the function of which is governed by statistical theory, 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 or systems the parameters of which are defined by systems, including inferential methodologies, linear regression, neural networks, decision trees, random forests and other learning algorithms, which automatically filter individuals or prospective individuals for employment or for any term, condition or privilege of employment in a way that establishes a preferred individual or individuals. The term does not include a tool that does not automate, support, substantially assist or replace discretionary decision-making processes and that does not materially impact natural persons, including, but not limited to, a junk email filter, firewall, antivirus software, calculator, spreadsheet, database, data set or other compilation of data.(cc) The term "bias audit" means an impartial evaluation by an independent auditor, including, but not limited to, testing of an automated employment decision tool to assess the tool's disparate impact on individuals protected against discrimination under the provisions of this act.(dd) The term "employment decision" means to screen individuals for employment or promotion or to otherwise help to decide compensation or any other terms, conditions or privileges of employment in this Commonwealth.Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 5.4. Use of Automated Employment Decision Tool.--(a) (1) An employer or employment agency that uses an automated employment decision tool to make or assist in making an employment decision shall:(i) Notify each individual at least ten days prior to their interview that an automated employment decision tool may be used to make or assist in making an employment decision.20250HB0594PN0602 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Provide each individual with information at least ten days prior to their interview explaining how the automated employment decision tool works and what general types of characteristics it uses to evaluate individuals for an employment decision.(iii) Obtain, prior to the interview, the individual's consent to use an automated employment decision tool to make or assist in making an employment decision.(2) An employer or employment agency may not use an automated employment decision tool to evaluate individuals who have not consented to the use of an automated employment decision tool.(b) An automated employment decision tool shall not be used to make or assist in making an employment decision unless the automated employment decision tool has been the subject of a bias audit conducted no more than one year prior to the use of the tool and a summary of the results of the most recent bias audit has been made available on the employer's or employment agency's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 3. Section 9.3 of the act is amended to read:Section 9.3. Civil Penalties.--(a) The Commission shall have the power to adopt a schedule of civil penalties for violation of section 5(h)(5) by the advertiser and the publisher in instances where the complainant does not take action to secure housing accommodations or financing and is not denied housing accommodations or financing based on the alleged discriminatory language in the advertisement. The schedule of penalties, guidelines for their imposition and procedures for appeal shall be published in the Pennsylvania Bulletin, provided that the Commission shall, within two (2) years of such 20250HB0594PN0602 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 publication, promulgate a regulation setting forth the schedule of penalties, guidelines and procedures. Any such penalty shall not exceed the sum of five hundred dollars ($500.00). Duly authorized agents of the Commission shall have the power and authority to issue citations and impose penalties for any such violations. Any such penalty imposed may be appealed to the Commission pursuant to regulations promulgated under this act. [All proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of 2 Pa.C.S. (relating to administrative law and procedure).](b) The Commission shall have the power to adopt a schedule of civil penalties for violation of section 5.4 by an employer or employment agency. The schedule of penalties, guidelines for their imposition and procedures for appeal shall be transmitted to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin, provided that the Commission shall, within two years of such publication, promulgate a regulation setting forth the schedule of penalties, guidelines and procedures. Any such penalty shall not exceed the sum of five hundred dollars ($500.00) for a first violation and not less than five hundred dollars ($500.00) nor more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00) for each subsequent violation. Duly authorized agents of the Commission shall have the power and authority to issue citations and impose penalties for any such violations. Any such penalty imposed may be appealed to the Commission pursuant to regulations promulgated under this act.(c) All proceedings under this section shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of 2 Pa.C.S. (relating to administrative law and procedure).20250HB0594PN0602 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0594PN0602 - 5 - 1